Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.032

Statement of prosecuting attorney—Delivery of statement.

Such statement shall be signed by the prosecuting attorney and approved by the judge by whom the judgment was rendered and shall be delivered to the sheriff, traveling guard, department of corrections personnel, or other officer executing the sentence, and a copy of such statement shall be furnished to the defendant or his or her attorney. Such officer shall deliver the statement, at the time of the prisoner's commitment, to the superintendent of the institution to which such prisoner has been committed. The superintendent shall make such statement available for use by the board.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 323; 1984 c 114 s 3; 1929 c 158 s 2; RRS s 10255.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.